Utah statutes.
13-34-107.6.   Confirmation of private nonprofit educational institution -- Effect of confirmation -- Fees.

(1)  Upon the request of an institution proving to the reasonable satisfaction of the division that the institution is an institution described in Subsection 13-34-105(1)(n), the division shall issue a written finding and confirmation to the institution confirming that it is an institution described in Subsection 13-34-105(1)(n).

(2)  A written finding and confirmation under Subsection (1) has the effect of establishing the institution by name as an educational institution by the state by action issued by a state agency, as contemplated in 34 C.F.R. Section 600.9(a)(1)(i)(a).

(3) (a)  The division shall establish a fee, not to exceed $1,500, for processing a request and issuing a written finding and confirmation as provided in Subsection (1).

(b)  Fees paid under this section shall be deposited in the Commerce Service Account created in Section 13-1-2.

(c)  A fee paid under this section is not refundable.

